ro-RO: Tip cap de mătură ondulată: Cap de perie cu pad înlocuibil; Spumă; Păr de cal; Pad din material sintetic; Altele
sk-SK: Typ hlavy curlingovej metly: Hlava s vymeniteľnou podložkou; Pena; Konské vlasy; Podložka zo syntetickej tkaniny; Iné
ko: 컬링 브룸 헤드 유형: 교체형 패드 브러시 헤드; 폼; 말총; 합성 섬유 패드; 기타
vi: Loại đầu chổi curling: Đầu bàn chải có miếng đệm thay thế; Mút xốp; Lông đuôi ngựa; Miếng đệm vải tổng hợp; Khác
de: Art des Curlingbesenkopfs: Bürstenkopf mit austauschbarem Pad; Schaumstoff; Rosshaar; Synthetikgewebe-Pad; Sonstige
hr-HR: Vrsta glave metle za uvijanje: Glava metle sa zamjenjivim jastučićem; Pjena; Konjska dlaka; Jastučić od sintetičke tkanine; Ostalo
th: ประเภทของหัวไม้กวาดเคอร์ลิง: หัวแปรงแบบเปลี่ยนแผ่นรองได้; โฟม; ขนม้า; แผ่นรองเส้นใยสังเคราะห์; อื่นๆ
ja: カーリング用ほうきヘッドタイプ: 交換可能パッド付きブラシヘッド; フォーム; 馬毛; 合成繊維パッド; その他
nb: Krøllekosthodetype: Børstehode med utskiftbar pute; Skum; Hestehår; Pute av syntetisk stoff; Annet
pt-BR: Tipo de cabeça para vassoura de curling: Cabeça de escova com base substituível; Espuma; Crina de cavalo; Base de tecido sintético; Outro
lt-LT: Kerlingo šepečio galvutės tipas: Šepečio galvutė su keičiamu padeliu; Porolonas; Ašutai; Sintetinio audinio padelis; Kita
pl: Typ główki szczotki do curlingu: Główka szczotki z wymienną podkładką; Pianka; Włosie końskie; Podkładka z tkaniny syntetycznej; Inne
nl: Curlingbezemkop type: Borstelkop met vervangbare pad; Schuim; Paardenhaar; Pad van synthetische stof; Overig
da: Curlingkostens hovedtype: Børstehoved med udskiftelig pude; Skum; Hestehår; Syntetisk stofpude; Andet
sv: Huvud för lockborste: Borsthuvud med utbytbar dyna; Skum; Tagel; Dyna i syntettyg; Övrigt
ru: Тип головки метлы для керлинга: Щетка со сменной насадкой; Пеноматериал; Конский волос; Насадка из синтетической ткани; Другое
it: Tipo di testina per arricciacapelli: Testa della spazzola con cuscinetto sostituibile; Schiuma; Crine di cavallo; Cuscinetto in tessuto sintetico; Altro
zh-TW: 冰壺刷頭類型: 附可替換刷墊的刷頭; 泡棉; 馬毛; 合成布墊; 其他
fr: Type de patin de balai de curling: Tête de brosse avec tampon remplaçable; Mousse; Crin de cheval; Tampon en tissu synthétique; Autre
el: Τύπος κεφαλής σκούπας κέρλινγκ: Κεφαλή βούρτσας με ανταλλακτικό μαξιλαράκι; Αφρώδες υλικό; Αλογότριχα; Μαξιλαράκι από συνθετικό ύφασμα; Άλλο
tr: Körling süpürge başlığı tipi: Değiştirilebilir pedli fırça başlığı; Köpük; At kılı; Sentetik kumaş pedi; Diğer
fi: Curlingharjan päätyyppi: Harjaspää vaihdettavalla tyynyllä; Vaahtomuovi; Jouhi; Synteettinen kangastyyny; Muu
cs: Typ hlavy curlingového koštěte: Hlava kartáče s vyměnitelnou podložkou; Pěna; Koňské žíně; Podložka ze syntetické tkaniny; Ostatní
pt-PT: Tipo de cabeça de vassoura encaracolada: Cabeça de escova com almofada substituível; Espuma; Crina de cavalo; Almofada de tecido sintético; Outro
bg-BG: Тип глава на метла за кърлинг: Глава на четка със сменяема подложка; Пяна; Конски косъм; Подложка от синтетична тъкан; Други
en: Curling broom head type: Brush head with replaceable pad; Foam; Horsehair; Synthetic fabric pad; Other
zh-CN: 冰壶刷刷头类型: 带可替换垫的刷头; 泡沫; 马毛; 合成面料垫; 其他
es: Tipo de cabezal de la escoba de curling: Cabeza de cepillo con almohadilla reemplazable; Espuma; Crin de caballo; Almohadilla de tela sintética; Otro
hu: Curlingseprűfej típusa: Kefe fej cserélhető párnával; Szivacs; Lószőr; Műszálas párna; Egyéb
sl-SI: Vrsta glave metle za curling: Glava krtače z zamenljivo blazinico; Pena; Konjska žima; Blazinica iz sintetična tkanine; Drugo